Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1357
Relationship to Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.

(a) The Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act supplements the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act and that act, other than section 25-1342, applies to a registration under the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act.

(b) A person may seek recognition of a Canadian judgment described in section 25-1351 either:

(1) by registration under the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act; or

(2) under section 25-1342.

(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a person may not seek recognition in this state of the same judgment or part of a judgment described in subsection (b) or (c) of section 25-1351 with regard to the same person under both the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act and section 25-1342.

(d) If the court grants a motion to vacate a registration solely on a ground under subdivision (b)(2) of section 25-1355, the person seeking registration may:

(1) if the defect in the registration can be cured, file a new registration under the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act; or

(2) seek recognition of the judgment under section 25-1342.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 21.

Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act, see section 25-1337.